Massachusetts, session 194th, S424.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 37 the following new section:- 
Section 38.  
(a) For the purposes of this section, “Mobile communication device” shall be defined as 
to any portable electronic device that enables voice communication, text messaging, internet 
access, and application usage, including but not limited to smartphones and tablets. 
(b) The department shall establish standards for school districts to prohibit the usage of 
mobile communication devices during instructional hours within all public elementary, 
secondary, and vocational schools. These standards shall require students store mobile 
communication devices in designated areas or lockers during school hours to minimize 
distractions and enhance focus during educational activities. The standards shall not prohibit 
authorized personnel from using mobile communication devices for official school purposes or 

of 2 13 students with documented medical needs or other exceptional circumstances from using mobile 
communication devices as approved by school administration. The standards shall require ensure 
schools establish clear communication to students and parents regarding the regulations and any 
consequences for violations of the school’s cell phone policy. 
(c) The standards may allow schools to adopt exceptions for cellular phones which do not 
provide internet access or application usage to its users, so that students may communicate with 
parents and guardians while minimizing noise and distractions to the learning environment. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect at the beginning of the next academic year 
following its passage.